apertium-oss.oss.dix
    <pardef n="enc_p2pl__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уӕ</l>
          <r>prenc<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уын</l>
          <r>prenc<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уӕм</l>
          <r>prenc<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="all"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уӕ</l>
          <r>prenc<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уӕ</l>
          <r>prenc<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уыл</l>
          <r>prenc<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ads"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уемӕ</l>
          <r>prenc<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="enc_p3pl__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>сӕ</l>
          <r>prenc<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>сын</l>
          <r>prenc<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>сӕм</l>
          <r>prenc<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="all"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>сӕ</l>
          <r>prenc<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>сӕ</l>
          <r>prenc<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>сыл</l>
          <r>prenc<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ads"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>семӕ</l>
          <r>prenc<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="personal_pronouns__prn">
      <e>
        <par n="pers_p1sg__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="pers_p2sg__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="pers_p3sg__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="pers_p1pl__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="pers_p2pl__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="pers_p3pl__prn"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="enclitic_pronouns__prn">
      <e>
        <par n="enc_p1sg__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="enc_p2sg__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="enc_p3sg__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="enc_p1pl__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="enc_p2pl__prn"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="enc_p3pl__prn"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="у/ый__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ый</l>
          <r>ый<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ый</l>
          <r>ый<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ымӕн</l>
          <r>ый<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ымӕ</l>
          <r>ый<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ымӕй</l>
          <r>ый<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ым</l>
          <r>ый<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уыл</l>
          <r>ый<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ads"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ыйау</l>
          <r>ый<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="equ"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ыимӕ</l>
          <r>ый<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="уыдон__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ы</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕн</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>мӕ</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="all"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕй</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ы</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ыл</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ads"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ау</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="equ"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>имӕ</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="а__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>й</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>мӕн</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>мӕ</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>мӕй</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>м</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уыл</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ads"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>йау</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="equ"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>имӕ</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="personal pronouns"><i/><par n="personal_pronouns__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="enclitic pronouns"><i/><par n="enclitic_pronouns__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="уый"><i>у</i><par n="у/ый__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="уыдон"><i>уыдон</i><par n="уыдон__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="а"><i>а</i><par n="а__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="адон"><i>адон</i><par n="уыдон__prn"/></e>
